dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="äg/a__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>d</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ds</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/yda__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ydas</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yda</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ytts</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ytt</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yd</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ytt</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ytts</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydd</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydds</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydda</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yddas</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydde</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yddes</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydda</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yddas</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydda</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yddas</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yddes</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öds</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydde</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öd</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ödes</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öde</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydande</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydandes</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydes</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yds</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yder</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ydes</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yde</l><r>yda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/as__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>agits</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ogs</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="umgälla"><i>umgäll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="motväga"><i>motväg</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hölja"><i>hölj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="behänga"><i>behäng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avväga"><i>avväg</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="benämna"><i>benämn</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skälla"><i>skäll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bygga"><i>bygg</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skrälla"><i>skräll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="följa"><i>följ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sönderspränga"><i>sönderspräng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="överskölja"><i>överskölj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prästviga"><i>prästvig</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bötfälla"><i>bötfäll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="värja"><i>värj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="åtlyda"><i>åtl</i><par n="l/yda__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="söva"><i>söv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förgylla"><i>förgyll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tillställa"><i>tillställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="återkräva"><i>återkräv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="framhäva"><i>framhäv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oppfylla"><i>oppfyll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="föranmäla"><i>föranmäl</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fälla"><i>fäll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fylla"><i>fyll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pliktfälla"><i>pliktfäll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dras"><i>dr</i><par n="t/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förställa"><i>förställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stänga"><i>stäng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kräva"><i>kräv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="polisanmäla"><i>polisanmäl</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bortränga"><i>borträng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förbygga"><i>förbygg</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fullfölja"><i>fullfölj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anstränga"><i>ansträng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="återställa"><i>återställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="framtränga"><i>framträng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spränga"><i>spräng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undanröja"><i>undanröj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skava"><i>skav</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="knäböja"><i>knäböj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nedgräva"><i>nedgräv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="friskanmäla"><i>friskanmäl</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avstänga"><i>avstäng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undantränga"><i>undanträng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skönja"><i>skönj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="framställa"><i>framställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nollställa"><i>nollställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="överanstränga"><i>överansträng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="väja"><i>väj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="likställa"><i>likställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vedergälla"><i>vedergäll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jämställa"><i>jämställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bebygga"><i>bebygg</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uppväga"><i>uppväg</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förspilla"><i>förspill</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utkräva"><i>utkräv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tänja"><i>tänj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ombesörja"><i>ombesörj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avbeställa"><i>avbeställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="urskönja"><i>urskönj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ärva"><i>ärv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sammanväva"><i>sammanväv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förvälla"><i>förväll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avvärja"><i>avvärj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inställa"><i>inställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="länga"><i>läng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förnöja"><i>förnöj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omställa"><i>omställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uppställa"><i>uppställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avböja"><i>avböj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leja"><i>lej</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sammanringa"><i>sammanring</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besörja"><i>besörj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vidhänga"><i>vidhäng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ansvälla"><i>ansväll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omvärva"><i>omvärv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sjukanmäla"><i>sjukanmäl</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="befalla"><i>befall</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="KU-anmäla"><i>KU-anmäl</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avskava"><i>avskav</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utestänga"><i>utestäng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kyla"><i>kyl</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spilla"><i>spill</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="färdigställa"><i>färdigställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ångförvälla"><i>ångförväll</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="böja"><i>böj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sörja"><i>sörj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tas"><i>t</i><par n="t/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="behöva"><i>behöv</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lyda"><i>l</i><par n="l/yda__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slänga"><i>släng</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vämja"><i>vämj</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utställa"><i>utställ</i><par n="äg/a__vblex"/></e>
